hu: Kazettatest típusa: Campagnolo; Örökhajtós/pálya; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Egysebességes szabadonfutó; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de corpo da cassete: Campagnolo; Carreto fixo/pista; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Roda livre de velocidade única; Outro
ru: Тип корпуса кассеты: Campagnolo; Фикс/трек; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Трещотка (односкоростная); Другое
it: Tipo di corpo della cassetta: Campagnolo; Scatto fisso/da pista; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Ruota libera a velocità singola; Altro
ja: カセット本体タイプ: Campagnolo; 固定ギア/トラック; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; シマノ Micro Spline; シマノ/SRAM HG; シングルスピードフリーホイール; その他
da: Type af kassettehus: Campagnolo; Fast gear/bane; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Single-speed-frihjul; Andet
lt-LT: Kasetės korpuso tipas: Campagnolo; Fiksuotos pavaros / treko; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano / SRAM HG; Vienos pavaros laisvoji eiga; Kita
zh-TW: 飛輪座類型: Campagnolo; 固定齒輪/場地車; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; 單速飛輪; 其他
es: Tipo de cuerpo de casete: Campagnolo; Piñón fijo/pista; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Rueda libre de una velocidad; Otro
fi: Kasettirunkotyyppi: Campagnolo; Kiinteä välitys / rata; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Yksivaihteinen vapaaratas; Muu
sv: Kassettkroppstyp: Campagnolo; Fixed gear/bana; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Frikrans (single-speed); Annat
pt-BR: Tipo de corpo de cassete: Campagnolo; Marcha fixa/pista; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Roda livre de velocidade única; Outro
pl: Typ korpusu kasety: Campagnolo; Ostre koło/torowe; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Wolnobieg jednorzędowy; Inne
fr: Type de boîtier de cassette: Campagnolo; Pignon fixe/piste; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Roue libre à une seule vitesse; Autre
nl: Cassette behuizing type: Campagnolo; Fixed gear/baan; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Single-speed freewheel; Overige
nb: Kassettkroppstype: Campagnolo; Fastgir/bane; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Éngirs frikrans; Annet
de: Freilaufkörpertyp: Campagnolo; Fixed-Gear/Bahn; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Single-Speed-Freilauf; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tipul corpului casetei: Campagnolo; Pinion fix/pistă; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Pinion single-speed (freewheel); Altele
el: Τύπος σώματος κασέτας: Campagnolo; Fixed gear/πίστας; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Ελεύθερο μίας ταχύτητας; Άλλο
zh-CN: 卡式磁带机身类型: Campagnolo; 死飞/场地车; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; 单速飞轮; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta tijela kasete: Campagnolo; Fiksni prijenos / staza; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano / SRAM HG; Slobodni kotač (single-speed); Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип корпус на касетата: Campagnolo; Фиксирана предавка/писта; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Едноскоростен свободен венец; Друго
vi: Loại thân băng cassette: Campagnolo; Fixed gear/track; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Líp đơn tốc; Khác
en: Cassette body type: Campagnolo; Fixed gear/track; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Single-speed freewheel; Other
th: ประเภทตัวเฟืองหลัง: Campagnolo; ฟิกซ์เกียร์/แทร็ก; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; ฟรีวีลสปีดเดียว; อื่นๆ
ko: 카세트 본체 유형: 캄파놀로; 픽시/트랙; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; 시마노 마이크로 스플라인; 시마노/SRAM HG; 싱글 기어 프리휠; 기타
tr: Kaset gövdesi tipi: Campagnolo; Sabit vites/pist; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Tek vitesli filibir; Diğer
cs: Typ těla kazety: Campagnolo; Pevný převod / dráhové; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Jednorychlostní volnoběžka; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ tela kazety: Campagnolo; Pevný prevod (furtšľap)/dráhové; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Jednorýchlostná voľnobežka; Iný
sl-SI: Tip ohišja verižnika: Campagnolo; Fiksni prenos/steza; SRAM XD; SRAM XDR; Shimano Micro Spline; Shimano/SRAM HG; Prosti tek z eno prestavo; Drugo